Tennessee, session 114, HB0108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-23-202, is amended by deleting
subsection (a) and substituting:
(a) The "pay period" for state employees shall be no less than twice per month
as determined by the commissioner of finance and administration. On or about the last
day of every such "pay period," all state employees shall be paid for the preceding
period or any part thereof for which compensation is due.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-23-202(b), is amended by deleting
the word "semimonthly".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0108
000170
- 1 -